Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1407
Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council; members; qualifications; terms; appointment; removal; hearing.

(1) The Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council shall consist of seven members appointed by the Governor. Six of the members shall be full-time officers or employees of a law enforcement agency and shall include one representative chief of police or his or her designee from a city of the metropolitan or primary class, a representative chief of police or his or her designee from a city of the first class, a representative chief of police or his or her designee from a city of the second class or village, a county sheriff or his or her designee from a county having a population of forty thousand or more, a county sheriff or his or her designee from a county having a population of forty thousand or less, and a member of the Nebraska State Patrol. The seventh member shall be a member of the Jail Standards Board or a person from the public at large. The representative chief of police or his or her designee from a city of the metropolitan or primary class shall not be a regular member of the commission.

(2) The members of the council shall serve for terms of four years each. Of the members first appointed, one shall serve for a term of one year, one shall serve for a term of two years, one shall serve for a term of three years, and two shall serve for terms of four years from January 1 next succeeding their appointment. Within ninety days after July 16, 1994, the Governor shall appoint the two additional members who shall serve for terms of four years from January 1 next succeeding their appointment. A member may be reappointed at the expiration of his or her term. Any vacancy occurring otherwise than by expiration of a term shall be filled, for the remainder of the unexpired term, in the same manner as the original appointment. The council shall select one of its members as chairperson.

(3) No member of the council shall serve beyond the time when he or she holds the office or employment by reason of which he or she was initially eligible for appointment. A member may be removed from the council for cause upon notice and an opportunity to be heard at a public hearing before the Governor. After the hearing, the Governor shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a complete statement of the charges, his or her findings and disposition, together with a complete record of the proceedings.

Laws 1969, c. 773, § 7, p. 2927;

Laws 1994, LB 971, § 6.